src/orth-kal.xfst
! =========================================== !
! Orthographic converter for West Greenlandic !
! =========================================== !

! This program translates text written in the Kleinschmidt orthography
! into the modern Greenlandic orthography.

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define vow  [ a | e | i | o | u |   
              á | é | í | ó | ú | à | è | ì | ò | ù | 
              ä | ë | ï | ö | ü | â | ê | î | ô | û | 
              ã | ẽ | ĩ | õ | ũ | y | ý | æ | ø | å ] ;
define WOW  [ A | E | I | O | U |  
              Á | É | Í | Ó | Ú | À | È | Ì | Ò | Ù | 
              Ä | Ë | Ï | Ö | Ü | Â | Ê | Î | Ô | Û | 
              Ã | Ẽ | Ĩ | Õ | Ũ | Y | Ý | Æ | Ø | Å ] ;

define Vow [ vow | WOW ] ;

define KalVow [ a | e | i | o | u | A | E | I | O | U ] ;

define ForVow [ Vow - KalVow ] ;

define LongVow [ a a | A a | A A | e e | E e | E E | i i | I i | I I |
                 o o | O o | O O | u u | U u | U U | a i | A i | A I ] ;

define cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | ð | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | 
             ñ | p | q | r | s | š | t | ŧ | v | w | x | z | ž ] ;   
define CNS [ B | C | Č | D | Đ | Ð | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | 
             Ñ | P | Q | R | S | Š | T | Ŧ | V | W | X | Z | Ž | ĸ | K’ ] ; 

define Cns [ cns | CNS ] ;
             
define S [ S | s ] ; 

define Cnss [ Cns - S ] ;
define SGM [ CNS | VOW ] ;
define Sgm [ Cns | Vow ] ;
define sgm [ cns | vow ] ;

echo << Rules>>

define nalunaaqutaq  r ĸ -> q || a l u n a e _ u t ;
define kra       ĸ -> q , K’ -> Q ;
define sloppykra K -> q || Sgm _ ; 
! eventually K -> Q || [ .#. | SGM ] _ ,, K -> q || [ .#. SGM | sgm ] _ ;
define ssRule  s s -> s || Vow _ Vow ;
define v0        v -> 0 || u _ Vow ;
define finalvowR  e -> i , ê -> î , o -> u ,  ô -> û || _ .#. ;
define longutilde û -> u u ;
define longvowR   â -> a a , ê -> e e , î -> i i , ô -> o o ;
define longcns f -> f f , g -> g g , k -> k k , l -> l l , m -> m m , 
               n -> n n , p -> p p , q -> q q , r -> r r , t -> t t , s -> s s
            || [ [á|é|í|ó|ú]|[á[i|u]]|ã|ẽ|ĩ|õ|ũ] _ ; ! all vow ~ 
define deacc á -> a   , é -> e   , í -> i   , ó -> o   , ú -> u ,
             ã -> a a , ẽ -> e e , ĩ -> i i , õ -> o o , ũ -> u u ; ! all V
define aaj       i -> j || a _ a ;
define aiau      i -> a , u -> a , e -> a , o -> a || a _ Sgm ;
define 2cnsi     v t -> t s , g t -> t s , t t -> t s || Vow _ [ i | e [r|q]] ; 
define 3cnsassim [g|v|t] d l -> l l , n g m -> m m , [ v | g n ] n -> n n , 
                 v n g -> n n g ,  [v|g] s s -> s s , r d l -> r l || Vow _ Vow ;
define 2cnsassim v g -> g g , v k -> k k , v n -> n n , v q -> q q , v s -> s s , 
                 v t -> t t , v f -> f f , 
                 g k -> k k , g p -> p p , g s -> s s , g t -> t t , g f -> f f ,
                 r q -> q q ; 
define rss       r s s -> r s ;       
define uveuvi    v -> 0 || u _ [e|i] ; 
define suj       u j -> i || .#. s _ ;
define ngn       n g n -> n n || Vow _ Vow ; ! agdlangneĸ

echo << Combining >>

read regex [ nalunaaqutaq
.o. kra
.o. sloppykra
.o. ssRule
.o. v0
.o. finalvowR
.o. longutilde
.o. longvowR
.o. longcns
.o. deacc
.o. aaj
.o. aiau
.o. 2cnsi
.o. 3cnsassim
.o. 2cnsassim
.o. rss
.o. uveuvi
.o. suj
.o. ngn ] ;

invert net ;
